Utah statutes.
31A-7-101.   Definition.

As used in this chapter, unless stated otherwise:

"Subscriber" means the person entitled by contract to health care benefits from a corporation licensed under this chapter.  "Subscriber" is used interchangeably with "policyholder" in individual contracts or "certificate holder" in group contracts.



Amended by Chapter 91, 1987 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 95, 1987 General Session

